Washington statutes.
RCW 39.40.030

Certification of votes—Canvass.

The election officials in each of the precincts included within any such district shall, as soon as possible and in no case later than five days after the closing of the polls of any election involving the issuance of bonds, certify to the county auditor of the county within which such district is located the total number of votes cast for and against each separate proposal and the vote shall be canvassed and certified by a canvassing board consisting of the chair of the board of county commissioners, the county auditor, and the prosecuting attorney who shall declare the result thereof.

[ 2011 c 336 s 806; 1959 c 290 s 4; 1925 c 13 s 3; RRS s 5646-3.]